Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB375.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 189 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section "Automated license plate reader" or "ALPR" means a
system of one (1) or more mobile or fixed high-speed cameras combined with
computer algorithms to convert images of license plates into data that is readable
by a computer system.
(2) A person, entity, partnership, corporation, association, or this Commonwealth or
an agency or political subdivision thereof shall not use, deploy, or maintain an
ALPR system.
(3) Using, deploying, or maintaining an ALPR system is a Class D felony with a fine
of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
(4) (a) In addition to the criminal penalty specified in subsection (3) of this section,
any person or entity who uses, deploys, or maintains an ALPR system shall
be liable for damages in a civil action.
(b) Any person who is recorded by an ALPR system shall have a cause of action
against any person or entity responsible for the violation, and the action
may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin further
violations and recover actual and punitive damages for any violation or
infringement.
(c) Any plaintiff who prevails in an action under this section against the user of
the ALPR system may be entitled to recover reasonable attorney's fees,
costs, and damages, unless the court finds the plaintiff has acted in bad
faith, with malicious purpose, or that there was a complete absence of
justifiable issue of either law or fact.
(d) Prevailing defendants may be entitled to recover reasonable attorney's fees.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/13/2026 5:02 PM Jacketed